North Carolina, session 2025, HB409.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the sum of one million seven hundred thousand dollars ($1,700,000) in
nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Caswell County
for the replacement of the Casville Volunteer Fire Department's facility.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H409-v-1*